Utah statutes.
64-9b-5.   Intent of Legislature.

It is the legislative intent, and inmates are encouraged, to use their personal earnings from jobs created under this chapter for the following:

(1)  for restitution to the victims of the inmate's criminal offense, where applicable;

(2)  for support of the inmate's family, where applicable;

(3)  for the inmate's personal use; and

(4)  for reimbursement of security, operational, and other costs incurred by the Utah Correctional Industries Division of the department in administering these projects.

